Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.165

Subpoenas—Compulsory process—Witnesses—Oaths—Testimony—Penalty.

(1) The state auditor, his or her employees and every person legally appointed to perform such service, may issue subpoenas and compulsory process and direct the service thereof by any constable or sheriff, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers before him or her at any designated time and place, and may administer oaths.

(2) When any person summoned to appear and give testimony neglects or refuses to do so, or neglects or refuses to answer any question that may be put to him or her touching any matter under examination, or to produce any books or papers required, the person making such examination shall apply to a superior court judge of the proper county to issue a subpoena for the appearance of such person before him or her; and the judge shall order the issuance of a subpoena for the appearance of such person forthwith before him or her to give testimony; and if any person so summoned fails to appear, or appearing, refuses to testify, or to produce any books or papers required, he or she shall be subject to like proceedings and penalties for contempt as witnesses in the superior court.

(3) Willful false swearing in any such examination is perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 225; 1995 c 301 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.